Washington statutes.
RCW 19.105.360

Filing of sales literature, contract form, disclosure supplements.

The camping resort operator or other registrant of offerings of camping resort contracts shall file with the director at least five business days prior to the first use thereof in the state of Washington (1) the proposed text of all advertisements and sales promotion literature, (2) its proposed form of camping resort contract, and (3) the text of any supplements or amendments to the written disclosures required to be furnished prospective purchasers under RCW 19.105.370: PROVIDED, That if the text in lieu of definitive copies of any materials are filed, definitive copies shall be filed with the director within five business days following the date of first use of the materials.

[ 1988 c 159 s 11; 1982 c 69 s 7.]